Arkansas, session 2025, HB1870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-1-116. Voter registration lists provided to federal courts.
(a) The Secretary of State may provide a voter registration list to a
federal court for purposes of selecting jurors on the condition that the
federal court jury coordinator provides notice to the Secretary of State
regarding an ineligible or potentially ineligible voter under subsection (b)
of this section.
(b)(1) The notice under subsection (a) of this section shall include
a list of each person disqualified or potentially disqualified as a
prospective juror from jury service due to the prospective juror being:
(A) A noncitizen of the United States;
(B) Convicted of a felony;
(C) Deceased;
*SSS276*
04-03-2025 11:23:32 SSS276

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1870
(D) A nonresident of this state; or
(E) A nonresident of the county.
(2) The notice under subsection (a) of this section shall
include the following information for each disqualified juror:
(A) The full name of the disqualified juror;
(B) Current and prior addresses, if any;
(C) Telephone number, if available;
(D) Date of birth; and
(E) The reason the prospective juror was disqualified.
(3) The federal court jury coordinator may provide additional
documentation showing the person's disqualification under subsection (b) of
this section with the notice submitted to the Secretary of State.
(c)(1) The notice prepared under subsection (a) of this section shall
be sent to the Secretary of State according to the jury summons cycle used by
the federal district court clerk.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section does not prevent the
notice from being sent more frequently.
(3) The notice under subsection (a) of this section may be
provided to the Secretary of State by:
(A) Mail;
(B) Facsimile transmission; or
(C) Email.
(d)(1) After verifying that the person disqualified or potentially
disqualified as a prospective juror is a registered voter but is ineligible
to be a voter under Arkansas law, the Secretary of State shall forward the
information to the county clerk where the voter is registered.
(2) The county clerk shall follow the procedures to remove the
voter from the voter registration list under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
51, § 11.

/s/Wing





04-03-2025 11:23:32 SSS276